Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5712.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32. It shall be the duty of the The attorney general, when required, to give his shall do both of the following: (a) Provide the attorney general's opinion upon on all questions of law submitted to him the attorney general by the legislature, or by either branch thereof, house of the legislature, or by the governor, auditor general, treasurer, or any other state officer. , and also to notify An opinion provided under this subdivision is only advisory and does not have legal authority. (b) Notify the county treasurer of the proper county , of the any neglect or refusal of any a prosecuting attorney to make the annual report to the attorney general required of him by law.